Louisiana, session 2026, SB444.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part XIII of Title 19 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised
of R.S. 19:396 through 409 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART XIII. EXPROPRIATION BY A DECLARATION OF TAKING BY THE
CITY OF ST. GEORGE
§396. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms shall have the meaning ascribed
to them:
A. "Governing authority" means the city council of the city of St.
George.
B. "Property" means any portion of immovable property, including
corporeal property, servitudes, rights-of-way, easements, and other rights in or
to immovable property, and any improvements thereon, located within the
corporate limits of the city of St. George.
C. "Owner" means any person appearing of record as having an interest
in the property sought to be expropriated.
§397. Authority to expropriate; declaration of taking
A. When the city of St. George cannot amicably acquire property needed
for a public purpose, the city may acquire such property by expropriation and
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 444 ENROLLED
may acquire the property prior to judgment in the trial court fixing the amount
of compensation due.
B. The authority granted by this Part applies to property needed for any
street, road, highway, bridge, drainage, stormwater, flood protection, water,
utility, sewerage, electric, capital, or any other public project of the city of St.
George.
C. Except as otherwise provided in this Part, expropriation shall be
conducted in the same manner as expropriation by the Department of
Transportation and Development pursuant to R.S. 48:441 through 460, insofar
as those provisions are applicable.
D. Nothing in this Part authorizes the city of St. George to acquire by
declaration of taking any facility, utility plant, servitude, right-of-way,
easement, or other immovable property right owned, leased, operated,
maintained, or used by a utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Louisiana
Public Service Commission to furnish electric, gas, water, or sewerage service.
Nothing in this Part shall affect applicable utility relocation law or any
authority existing under R.S. 19:102 or other law.
§398. Petition for expropriation; venue
A. The city of St. George shall institute expropriation proceedings by
filing a petition in the Nineteenth Judicial District Court in the parish of East
Baton Rouge.
B. The petition shall include the following:
(1) Statement of the public purpose for which the property is sought.
(2) Description of the property to be expropriated.
(3) Name of each owner of record.
(4) Request for an order of expropriation and declaration of taking.
§399. Resolution of necessity; attachments to petition
A. Prior to filing suit under this Part, the governing authority shall adopt
a resolution authorizing the expropriation.
B. The resolution shall include a determination that the taking serves a
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 444 ENROLLED
public purpose and is necessary for the project.
C. The petition shall have annexed thereto:
(1) A certified copy of the resolution of the governing authority.
(2) An itemized statement of the amount of money estimated to be just
compensation for the property taken or damages incurred, signed by the person
or persons making the estimate, stating the capacity in which they acted and the
date of the estimate.
§400. Order of expropriation; deposit; vesting of title
A. Upon presentation of the petition and attachments, the court shall
issue an order directing the city of St. George to deposit the estimated
compensation into the registry of the court and declaring the property described
in the petition transferred to the city of St. George upon deposit.
B. Upon deposit:
(1) Title to the property shall vest immediately in the city of St. George.
(2) The right to just compensation shall vest in the owner or owners.
(3) The city of St. George may enter upon and take possession of the
property, subject to the provisions of this Part.
§401. Possession; inhabited improvements
A. If no inhabited improvement is located on the property, the city of St.
George may take possession immediately upon deposit.
B. If an inhabited improvement is located wholly or partially upon the
property, the court may postpone physical possession for a period not exceeding
thirty days from the date of service of the order, or for such additional period
as the court may determine upon fixing reasonable rental compensation.
§402. Service of pleadings
Certified copies of the petition, order of expropriation, and receipt for
deposit shall be served upon each owner in accordance with law.
§403. Withdrawal of deposit
A. Upon application by any owner, the court may order all or any
portion of the deposited funds paid to the owner on account of compensation to
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 444 ENROLLED
be awarded.
B. The court shall order payment of taxes, liens, mortgages, and other
encumbrances from the deposited funds as provided by law.
§404. Challenge to validity of taking
A. Any owner may contest the validity of the taking on the grounds that:
(1) The property was not expropriated for a public purpose.
(2) The petition or attachments fail to comply with this Part.
B. A motion to dismiss shall be filed within twenty-one days after service
of the petition and shall be tried contradictorily with preference.
C. Failure to timely file a motion to dismiss constitutes a waiver of all
defenses to the taking except claims for compensation or damages.
§405. Answer; delay
A. Any owner seeking compensation or damages shall file an answer
within thirty days after service for a total taking, or ninety days after service for
a partial taking.
B. The answer shall set forth the nature and amount of compensation or
damages claimed.
§406. Trial on compensation
A. After an answer is filed and any motion to dismiss resolved, either
party may request that the case be fixed for trial.
B. The court shall set the matter for trial with preference and shall
provide at least thirty days notice of trial.
§407. Judgment
The court shall render judgment fixing just compensation and damages,
if any, and ordering payment or refund of any excess deposit in accordance with
law.
§408. Interest
Legal interest shall accrue on any amount awarded in excess of the
deposited estimate from the date of taking until paid.
§409. Additional authority
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 444 ENROLLED
The authority granted by this Part is in addition to any other
expropriation authority granted by law and shall not be construed to limit or
impair any other power of the city of St. George.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.